data/paradigms.lexd
StemsV_P82a_preterite InflV_P82a_preterite
StemsV_P83_present InflV_P83_present
StemsV_P83_preterite InflV_P83_preterite
StemsV_P84_present InflV_P84_present
StemsV_P84_preterite InflV_P84_preterite
StemsV_P85_pres_stem InflV_P85_pres_stem
StemsV_P86_pres_stem InflV_P86_pres_stem
StemsV_P87_pres_stem InflV_P87_pres_stem
StemsV_P88_pres_stem InflV_P88_pres_stem
StemsV_P89_present InflV_P89_present
StemsV_P89_preterite InflV_P89_preterite
StemsV_P91_present InflV_P91_present
StemsV_P91_preterite InflV_P91_preterite
StemsV_P92_present InflV_P92_present
StemsV_P92_preterite InflV_P92_preterite
StemsV_P93_present InflV_P93_present
StemsV_P93_preterite InflV_P93_preterite
StemsV_P94_present InflV_P94_present
StemsV_P94_preterite InflV_P94_preterite
StemsV_P95_present InflV_P95_present
StemsV_P95_preterite InflV_P95_preterite
StemsV_P96_present InflV_P96_present
StemsV_P96_preterite InflV_P96_preterite
StemsV_P97_present InflV_P97_present
StemsV_P97_preterite InflV_P97_preterite
StemsV_P98_present InflV_P98_present
StemsV_P98_preterite InflV_P98_preterite
StemsV_P99_present InflV_P99_present
StemsV_P99_preterite InflV_P99_preterite
StemsVp_P29_decl InflVp_P29_decl
StemsVp_P68_decl InflVp_P68_decl
StemsVp_P69_decl InflVp_P69_decl
StemsVw_P100_inf_stem InflVw_P100_inf_stem
StemsVw_P100_present InflVw_P100_present
StemsVw_P100_preterite InflVw_P100_preterite
StemsVw_P102_inf_stem InflVw_P102_inf_stem
StemsVw_P102_present InflVw_P102_present
StemsVw_P102_preterite InflVw_P102_preterite
StemsVw_P102a_inf_stem InflVw_P102a_inf_stem
StemsVw_P102a_present InflVw_P102a_present
StemsVw_P102a_preterite InflVw_P102a_preterite
StemsVw_P104_inf_stem InflVw_P104_inf_stem
StemsVw_P106_inf_stem InflVw_P106_inf_stem
StemsVw_P106b_inf_stem InflVw_P106b_inf_stem
StemsVw_P109_inf_stem InflVw_P109_inf_stem
StemsVw_P109_present InflVw_P109_present
StemsVw_P109_preterite InflVw_P109_preterite
StemsVw_P110_inf_stem InflVw_P110_inf_stem
StemsVw_P110_preterite InflVw_P110_preterite
StemsVw_P111_inf_stem InflVw_P111_inf_stem
StemsVw_P111_preterite InflVw_P111_preterite
StemsVw_P112_inf_stem InflVw_P112_inf_stem
StemsVw_P112_present InflVw_P112_present
StemsVw_P112_preterite InflVw_P112_preterite
StemsVw_P113_inf_stem InflVw_P113_inf_stem
StemsVw_P113_present InflVw_P113_present
StemsVw_P113_preterite InflVw_P113_preterite
StemsVw_P114_inf_stem InflVw_P114_inf_stem
StemsVw_P114_present InflVw_P114_present
StemsVw_P114_preterite InflVw_P114_preterite
StemsVw_P116_inf_stem InflVw_P116_inf_stem
StemsVw_P116_present InflVw_P116_present
StemsVw_P116_preterite InflVw_P116_preterite
StemsVw_P120_inf_stem InflVw_P120_inf_stem
StemsVw_P120_present InflVw_P120_present
StemsVw_P120_preterite InflVw_P120_preterite
StemsVw_P122_inf_stem InflVw_P122_inf_stem
StemsVw_P122_pres_stem InflVw_P122_pres_stem
StemsVw_P123_inf_stem InflVw_P123_inf_stem
StemsVw_P123_preterite InflVw_P123_preterite
StemsVw_P124_inf_stem InflVw_P124_inf_stem
StemsVw_P124_present InflVw_P124_present
StemsVw_P124_preterite InflVw_P124_preterite
StemsVw_P125_inf_stem InflVw_P125_inf_stem
StemsVw_P125_present InflVw_P125_present
StemsVw_P125_preterite InflVw_P125_preterite
StemsVw_P126_inf_stem InflVw_P126_inf_stem
StemsVw_P126_preterite InflVw_P126_preterite
StemsVw_P128_inf_stem InflVw_P128_inf_stem
StemsVw_P128_present InflVw_P128_present
StemsVw_P128_preterite InflVw_P128_preterite
StemsVw_P131_inf_stem InflVw_P131_inf_stem
StemsVw_P131_pres_stem InflVw_P131_pres_stem
StemsVw_P132_inf_stem InflVw_P132_inf_stem
StemsVw_P132_pres_stem InflVw_P132_pres_stem
StemsVw_P133_inf_stem InflVw_P133_inf_stem
StemsVw_P134_inf_stem InflVw_P134_inf_stem
StemsVw_P134_pres_stem InflVw_P134_pres_stem
StemsVw_P134a_inf_stem InflVw_P134a_inf_stem
StemsVw_P134a_pres_stem InflVw_P134a_pres_stem
StemsVw_P135_inf_stem InflVw_P135_inf_stem
StemsVw_P135_pres_stem InflVw_P135_pres_stem
StemsVw_P135_present InflVw_P135_present
StemsVw_P135_preterite InflVw_P135_preterite
StemsVw_P136_inf_stem InflVw_P136_inf_stem
StemsVw_P136_pres_stem InflVw_P136_pres_stem
StemsVw_P136_present InflVw_P136_present
StemsVw_P136_preterite InflVw_P136_preterite
StemsVw_P137_inf_stem InflVw_P137_inf_stem
StemsVw_P137_present InflVw_P137_present
StemsVw_P137_preterite InflVw_P137_preterite
StemsVw_P137a_inf_stem InflVw_P137a_inf_stem
StemsVw_P137a_present InflVw_P137a_present
StemsVw_P137a_preterite InflVw_P137a_preterite
StemsVw_P138_inf_stem InflVw_P138_inf_stem
StemsVw_P138_pres_stem InflVw_P138_pres_stem
StemsVw_P139_inf_stem InflVw_P139_inf_stem
StemsVw_P139_pres_stem InflVw_P139_pres_stem
StemsVw_P140_inf_stem InflVw_P140_inf_stem
StemsVw_P140_present InflVw_P140_present
StemsVw_P140_preterite InflVw_P140_preterite
StemsVw_P141_inf_stem InflVw_P141_inf_stem
StemsVw_P141_present InflVw_P141_present
StemsVw_P141_preterite InflVw_P141_preterite
StemsVw_P142_inf_stem InflVw_P142_inf_stem
StemsVw_P142_present InflVw_P142_present
StemsVw_P142_preterite InflVw_P142_preterite
StemsVw_P143_inf_stem InflVw_P143_inf_stem
StemsVw_P143_pres_stem InflVw_P143_pres_stem
StemsVw_P144_inf_stem InflVw_P144_inf_stem
StemsVw_P144_present InflVw_P144_present
StemsVw_P144_preterite InflVw_P144_preterite
StemsVw_P71_inf_stem InflVw_P71_inf_stem
StemsVw_P71_pres_stem InflVw_P71_pres_stem
StemsVw_P72_inf_stem InflVw_P72_inf_stem
StemsVw_P72_pres_stem InflVw_P72_pres_stem
StemsVw_P73_inf_stem InflVw_P73_inf_stem
StemsVw_P73_pres_stem InflVw_P73_pres_stem
StemsVw_P75_inf_stem InflVw_P75_inf_stem
StemsVw_P75_preterite InflVw_P75_preterite
StemsVw_P75a_inf_stem InflVw_P75a_inf_stem
StemsVw_P75b_inf_stem InflVw_P75b_inf_stem
StemsVw_P76_inf_stem InflVw_P76_inf_stem
StemsVw_P76_preterite InflVw_P76_preterite
StemsVw_P76s_inf_stem InflVw_P76s_inf_stem
StemsVw_P76s_preterite InflVw_P76s_preterite
StemsVw_P77_inf_stem InflVw_P77_inf_stem
StemsVw_P77_present InflVw_P77_present
StemsVw_P77_preterite InflVw_P77_preterite
StemsVw_P79_inf_stem InflVw_P79_inf_stem
StemsVw_P79_present InflVw_P79_present
StemsVw_P79_preterite InflVw_P79_preterite
StemsVw_P80b_inf_stem InflVw_P80b_inf_stem
StemsVw_P80b_present InflVw_P80b_present
StemsVw_P80b_preterite InflVw_P80b_preterite
StemsVw_P81_inf_stem InflVw_P81_inf_stem
StemsVw_P81_present InflVw_P81_present
StemsVw_P81_preterite InflVw_P81_preterite
StemsVw_P81a_inf_stem InflVw_P81a_inf_stem
StemsVw_P81a_present InflVw_P81a_present
StemsVw_P81a_preterite InflVw_P81a_preterite
StemsVw_P81b_inf_stem InflVw_P81b_inf_stem
StemsVw_P81b_present InflVw_P81b_present
StemsVw_P81b_preterite InflVw_P81b_preterite
StemsVw_P81c_inf_stem InflVw_P81c_inf_stem
StemsVw_P81c_present InflVw_P81c_present
StemsVw_P81c_preterite InflVw_P81c_preterite
StemsVw_P82_inf_stem InflVw_P82_inf_stem
StemsVw_P82_preterite InflVw_P82_preterite
StemsVw_P82a_inf_stem InflVw_P82a_inf_stem
StemsVw_P82a_present InflVw_P82a_present
StemsVw_P82a_preterite InflVw_P82a_preterite
StemsVw_P83_inf_stem InflVw_P83_inf_stem
StemsVw_P83_present InflVw_P83_present
StemsVw_P83_preterite InflVw_P83_preterite
StemsVw_P84_inf_stem InflVw_P84_inf_stem
StemsVw_P84_present InflVw_P84_present
StemsVw_P84_preterite InflVw_P84_preterite
StemsVw_P85_inf_stem InflVw_P85_inf_stem
StemsVw_P85_pres_stem InflVw_P85_pres_stem
StemsVw_P85_present InflVw_P85_present
StemsVw_P85_preterite InflVw_P85_preterite
StemsVw_P86_inf_stem InflVw_P86_inf_stem
StemsVw_P86_pres_stem InflVw_P86_pres_stem
StemsVw_P87_inf_stem InflVw_P87_inf_stem
StemsVw_P87_pres_stem InflVw_P87_pres_stem
StemsVw_P87_present InflVw_P87_present
StemsVw_P87_preterite InflVw_P87_preterite
StemsVw_P88_inf_stem InflVw_P88_inf_stem
StemsVw_P88_pres_stem InflVw_P88_pres_stem
StemsVw_P88_present InflVw_P88_present
StemsVw_P88_preterite InflVw_P88_preterite
StemsVw_P89_inf_stem InflVw_P89_inf_stem
StemsVw_P89_present InflVw_P89_present
StemsVw_P89_preterite InflVw_P89_preterite
StemsVw_P90_inf_stem InflVw_P90_inf_stem
StemsVw_P91_inf_stem InflVw_P91_inf_stem
StemsVw_P91_present InflVw_P91_present
StemsVw_P91_preterite InflVw_P91_preterite
StemsVw_P92_inf_stem InflVw_P92_inf_stem
StemsVw_P92_present InflVw_P92_present
StemsVw_P92_preterite InflVw_P92_preterite
StemsVw_P93_inf_stem InflVw_P93_inf_stem
StemsVw_P93_present InflVw_P93_present
StemsVw_P93_preterite InflVw_P93_preterite
StemsVw_P94_inf_stem InflVw_P94_inf_stem
StemsVw_P94_present InflVw_P94_present
StemsVw_P94_preterite InflVw_P94_preterite
StemsVw_P95_inf_stem InflVw_P95_inf_stem
StemsVw_P95_present InflVw_P95_present
StemsVw_P95_preterite InflVw_P95_preterite
StemsVw_P96_inf_stem InflVw_P96_inf_stem
StemsVw_P96_present InflVw_P96_present
StemsVw_P96_preterite InflVw_P96_preterite
StemsVw_P97_inf_stem InflVw_P97_inf_stem
StemsVw_P97_present InflVw_P97_present
StemsVw_P97_preterite InflVw_P97_preterite
StemsVw_P97a_inf_stem InflVw_P97a_inf_stem
StemsVw_P98_inf_stem InflVw_P98_inf_stem
StemsVw_P98_present InflVw_P98_present
StemsVw_P98_preterite InflVw_P98_preterite
StemsVw_P99_inf_stem InflVw_P99_inf_stem
StemsVw_P99_present InflVw_P99_present
StemsVw_P99_preterite InflVw_P99_preterite
StemsVw_Pimp_ais_imperative InflVw_Pimp_ais_imperative
StemsVw_Pimp_is_imperative InflVw_Pimp_is_imperative
StemsVw_Pimp_jais_imperative InflVw_Pimp_jais_imperative
StemsVw_Pimp_s_imperative InflVw_Pimp_s_imperative
StemsVw_Pimp_āis_imperative InflVw_Pimp_āis_imperative
FuncWords
Adverbs
Variants

LEXICON InflN_P10_x
<Pl><Acc>:·ins[gFem]
<Pl><Acc>:·ins[gMsc]
<Pl><Acc>:i[gNeut]
<Pl><Dat>:·ins[gFem]
<Pl><Dat>:·ins[gMsc]
<Pl><Dat>:i[gNeut]
<Pl><Gen>:·ins[gFem]
<Pl><Gen>:·ins[gMsc]
<Pl><Gen>:i[gNeut]
<Pl><Nom>:·ei[gFem]
<Pl><Nom>:·ei[gMsc]
<Pl><Nom>:i[gNeut]
<Sg><Acc>:·in[gFem]
<Sg><Acc>:·in[gMsc]
<Sg><Acc>:i[gNeut]
<Sg><Dat>:·in[gFem]
<Sg><Dat>:·in[gMsc]
<Sg><Dat>:i[gNeut]
<Sg><Gen>:·in[gFem]
<Sg><Gen>:·in[gMsc]
<Sg><Gen>:i[gNeut]
<Sg><Nom>:is[gFem]
<Sg><Nom>:is[gMsc]
<Sg><Nom>:i[gNeut]

LEXICON InflN_P11_x
<Pl><Acc>:·ans[gFem]
<Pl><Acc>:·ans[gMsc]
<Pl><Acc>:a[gNeut]
<Pl><Dat>:·ēimans[gFem]
<Pl><Dat>:·ēimans[gMsc]
<Pl><Dat>:·esmu[gNeut]
<Pl><Gen>:·ēisan[gFem]
<Pl><Gen>:·ēisan[gMsc]
<Pl><Gen>:·esse[gNeut]
<Pl><Nom>:·ās[gFem]
<Pl><Nom>:·āi[gMsc]
<Pl><Nom>:a[gNeut]
<Sg><Acc>:·an[gFem]
<Sg><Acc>:·an[gMsc]
<Sg><Acc>:a[gNeut]
<Sg><Dat>:·essei[gFem]
<Sg><Dat>:·esmu[gMsc]
<Sg><Dat>:·esmu[gNeut]
<Sg><Gen>:·esses[gFem]
<Sg><Gen>:·esse[gMsc]
<Sg><Gen>:·esse[gNeut]
<Sg><Nom>:·āi[gFem]
<Sg><Nom>:·as[gMsc]
<Sg><Nom>:a[gNeut]

LEXICON InflN_P115_x
<Pl><Acc>:·būwusins[gFem]
<Pl><Acc>:·būwus[gNeut]
<Pl><Dat>:·būwusimans[gFem,gNeut]
<Pl><Gen>:·būwusin[gFem,gNeut]
<Pl><Nom>:·būwušas[gFem]
<Pl><Nom>:·būwus[gNeut]
<Sg><Acc>:·būwusin[gFem]
<Sg><Acc>:·būwus[gNeut]
<Sg><Dat>:·būwušai[gFem]
<Sg><Dat>:·būwušasmu[gNeut]
<Sg><Gen>:·būwušas[gFem,gNeut]
<Sg><Nom>:·būwusi[gFem]
<Sg><Nom>:·būwus[gNeut]

LEXICON InflN_P118_x
<Pl><Acc>:·dāwusins[gFem]
<Pl><Acc>:·dāwus[gNeut]
<Pl><Dat>:·dāwusimans[gFem,gNeut]
<Pl><Gen>:·dāwusin[gFem,gNeut]
<Pl><Nom>:·dāwušas[gFem]
<Pl><Nom>:·dāwus[gNeut]
<Sg><Acc>:·dāwusin[gFem]
<Sg><Acc>:·dāwus[gNeut]
<Sg><Dat>:·dāwušai[gFem]
<Sg><Dat>:·dāwušasmu[gNeut]
<Sg><Gen>:·dāwušas[gFem,gNeut]
<Sg><Nom>:·dāwusi[gFem]
<Sg><Nom>:·dāwus[gNeut]

LEXICON InflN_P12_x
<Pl><Acc>:·ennans[gMsc]
<Pl><Dat>:·enēimans[gMsc]
<Pl><Gen>:·enēisan[gMsc]
<Pl><Nom>:·enēi[gMsc]
<Sg><Acc>:·ennan[gMsc]
<Sg><Dat>:·enesmu[gMsc]
<Sg><Gen>:·enesse[gMsc]
<Sg><Nom>:·āns[gMsc]

LEXICON InflN_P13_x
<Pl><Acc>:·nans[gFem]
<Pl><Dat>:·ēimans[gFem]
<Pl><Gen>:·ēisan[gFem]
<Pl><Nom>:·nas[gFem]
<Sg><Acc>:·nan[gFem]
<Sg><Dat>:·essei[gFem]
<Sg><Gen>:·esses[gFem]
<Sg><Nom>:ā[gFem]

LEXICON InflN_P14_x
<Pl><Acc>:·nans[gNeut]
<Pl><Dat>:·ēimans[gNeut]
<Pl><Gen>:·ēisan[gNeut]
<Pl><Nom>:·ēi[gNeut]
<Sg><Acc>:·nan[gNeut]
<Sg><Dat>:·esmu[gNeut]
<Sg><Gen>:·esse[gNeut]
<Sg><Nom>:·nan[gNeut]
